Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-2201
Act, how cited.

Sections 72-2201 to 72-2216 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska State Capitol Preservation and Restoration Act.

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 684, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB848, § 10;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 17.